dictionaries/tr_TR/tr_TR.aff
FLAG num
SFX 59159 N 1
SFX 59159 0 örlerince .

SFX 59160 N 1
SFX 59160 0 tırılmaması .

SFX 59161 N 1
SFX 59161 0 ecin .

SFX 59162 N 1
SFX 59162 0 lsüz .

SFX 59163 N 1
SFX 59163 0 kluğum .

SFX 59164 N 1
SFX 59164 0 gelenden .

SFX 59165 N 1
SFX 59165 0 yeliği .

SFX 59166 N 1
SFX 59166 0 rmeyeyim .

SFX 59167 N 1
SFX 59167 0 ostan .

SFX 59168 N 1
SFX 59168 0 ğinse .

SFX 59169 N 1
SFX 59169 0 stini .

SFX 59170 N 1
SFX 59170 0 ldiğiyle .

SFX 59171 N 1
SFX 59171 0 lerineydi .

SFX 59172 N 1
SFX 59172 0 amamayı .

SFX 59173 N 1
SFX 59173 0 ilerinkinden .

SFX 59174 N 1
SFX 59174 0 yacağıdır .

SFX 59175 N 1
SFX 59175 0 tirebileceğin .

SFX 59176 N 1
SFX 59176 0 nleştirmek .

SFX 59177 N 1
SFX 59177 0 ndüğünde .

SFX 59178 N 1
SFX 59178 0 ikteyim .

SFX 59179 N 1
SFX 59179 0 zlikleridir .

SFX 59180 N 1
SFX 59180 0 meyeceğim .

SFX 59181 N 1
SFX 59181 0 irmedim .

SFX 59182 N 1
SFX 59182 0 lamazlar .

SFX 59183 N 1
SFX 59183 0 ciklerine .

SFX 59184 N 1
SFX 59184 0 ınkiler .

SFX 59185 N 1
SFX 59185 0 mdim .

SFX 59186 N 1
SFX 59186 0 ızlarsa .

SFX 59187 N 1
SFX 59187 0 şmalıydı .

SFX 59188 N 1
SFX 59188 0 tilirken .

SFX 59189 N 1
SFX 59189 0 rsinizdir .

SFX 59190 N 1
SFX 59190 0 rmediğim .

SFX 59191 N 1
SFX 59191 0 şınıza .

SFX 59192 N 1
SFX 59192 0 liliğim .

SFX 59193 N 1
SFX 59193 0 alistlere .

SFX 59194 N 1
SFX 59194 0 inip .

SFX 59195 N 1
SFX 59195 0 şmiyorlar .

SFX 59196 N 1
SFX 59196 0 üreceği .

SFX 59197 N 1
SFX 59197 0 anlıklarda .

SFX 59198 N 1
SFX 59198 0 ndırsanız .

SFX 59199 N 1
SFX 59199 0 ymişsin .

SFX 59200 N 1
SFX 59200 0 ırırsınız .

SFX 59201 N 1
SFX 59201 0 alciler .

SFX 59202 N 1
SFX 59202 0 simin .

SFX 59203 N 1
SFX 59203 0 anmalı .

SFX 59204 N 1
SFX 59204 0 ıldıysa .

SFX 59205 N 1
SFX 59205 0 slerindendir .

SFX 59206 N 1
SFX 59206 0 itesiyle .

SFX 59207 N 1
SFX 59207 0 mezim .

SFX 59208 N 1
SFX 59208 0 üklerinizin .

SFX 59209 N 1
SFX 59209 0 ikleriymiş .

SFX 59210 N 1
SFX 59210 0 düne .

SFX 59211 N 1
SFX 59211 0 yenlerimizin .

SFX 59212 N 1
SFX 59212 0 zdaysa .

SFX 59213 N 1
SFX 59213 0 sisin .

SFX 59214 N 1
SFX 59214 0 luğundayım .

SFX 59215 N 1
SFX 59215 0 bandın .

SFX 59216 N 1
SFX 59216 0 rabilmeli .

SFX 59217 N 1
SFX 59217 0 etimizde .

SFX 59218 N 1
SFX 59218 0 atken .

SFX 59219 N 1
SFX 59219 0 rabilir .

SFX 59220 N 1
SFX 59220 0 tırıyorsak .

SFX 59221 N 1
SFX 59221 0 kilerime .

SFX 59222 N 1
SFX 59222 0 enizdedir .

SFX 59223 N 1
SFX 59223 0 eğize .

SFX 59224 N 1
SFX 59224 0 oku .

SFX 59225 N 1
SFX 59225 0 lişi .

SFX 59226 N 1
SFX 59226 0 şlermiş .

SFX 59227 N 1
SFX 59227 0 dını .

SFX 59228 N 1
SFX 59228 0 llerse .

SFX 59229 N 1
SFX 59229 0 lenirsen .

SFX 59230 N 1
SFX 59230 0 leştirebiliyor .

SFX 59231 N 1
SFX 59231 0 landırırsanız .

SFX 59232 N 1
SFX 59232 0 tçıyla .

SFX 59233 N 1
SFX 59233 0 mışmışız .

SFX 59234 N 1
SFX 59234 0 arınkiler .

SFX 59235 N 1
SFX 59235 0 nabilirlerdi .

SFX 59236 N 1
SFX 59236 0 tçuya .

SFX 59237 N 1
SFX 59237 0 şımla .

SFX 59238 N 1
SFX 59238 0 ştıklarıyla .

SFX 59239 N 1
SFX 59239 0 lüklerde .

SFX 59240 N 1
SFX 59240 0 kçenin .

SFX 59241 N 1
SFX 59241 0 nundan .

SFX 59242 N 1
SFX 59242 0 yişlerini .

SFX 59243 N 1
SFX 59243 0 ucuna .

SFX 59244 N 1
SFX 59244 0 ndirmesin .

SFX 59245 N 1
SFX 59245 0 ddim .

SFX 59246 N 1
SFX 59246 0 tirdiklerin .

SFX 59247 N 1
SFX 59247 0 rleşir .

SFX 59248 N 1
SFX 59248 0 alıdırlar .

SFX 59249 N 1
SFX 59249 0 lmişsiniz .

SFX 59250 N 1
SFX 59250 0 adıkların .

SFX 59251 N 1
SFX 59251 0 müştük .

SFX 59252 N 1
SFX 59252 0 eyicilerin .

SFX 59253 N 1
SFX 59253 0 ntlar .

SFX 59254 N 1
SFX 59254 0 eğizine .

SFX 59255 N 1
SFX 59255 0 zdadırlar .

SFX 59256 N 1
SFX 59256 0 lleştirmez .

SFX 59257 N 1
SFX 59257 0 uktansa .

SFX 59258 N 1
SFX 59258 0 attandı .

SFX 59259 N 1
SFX 59259 0 leştiğinden .

SFX 59260 N 1
SFX 59260 0 verdi .

SFX 59261 N 1
SFX 59261 0 mer .

SFX 59262 N 1
SFX 59262 0 lamız .

SFX 59263 N 1
SFX 59263 0 sızlıklarımı .

SFX 59264 N 1
SFX 59264 0 nüze .

SFX 59265 N 1
SFX 59265 0 ndirmenizi .
